California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(2) A notice, if applicable, that the food delivery platform charges a fee, commission, or cost to the food facility, unless the food facility directs that the food delivery platform disclose to customers the delivery fee
 charged to the food facility and each fee, commission, or cost charged to the food facility.

(3) Each fee, commission, and any other cost charged to the customer by the food delivery platform.

(4) Any tip or gratuity payable to the delivery driver or food facility.

(c) A food delivery platform shall prominently disclose to the person delivering the food or beverage an accurate, clearly identified, and itemized breakdown of the pay received for a delivery, including, but not limited to, the base pay, gratuity or tips, and any promotional bonuses.

(d) (1) A listing website shall not associate a telephone number or other method of
 direct communication with a food facility on the listing website’s internet website or application if the listing website knows the use of that telephone number or other method of direct communication will result in a forwarded call.

(2) A listing website shall clearly and conspicuously disclose if an order placed through a telephone number or other interface on the listing website’s internet website or application may result in a fee, commission, or cost paid to a party other than the food facility and shall identify that other party.

(e) A food delivery platform shall clearly and regularly disclose to the food facility and the customer the status of the order, including all of the following:

(1) The method of delivery.

(2) The anticipated date and time of the delivery of the order.

(3) Confirmation that the order has been successfully delivered or that the delivery cannot be completed.

(f) A food delivery platform shall include a clear and conspicuous customer service feature that allows a customer to contact a natural person. The food delivery platform may use an automated system to address customer service concerns. However, if the automated system is unable to address the customer’s concerns, the food delivery platform shall ensure that the customer is able to promptly connect with the natural person in order to address the concern.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 341, Sec. 1.   (AB 578)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22599.2.

(a) A food delivery platform shall provide a full refund, including all taxes, commissions, fees, and gratuities, to the customer if an order is not delivered or the wrong order is delivered, unless the food delivery platform determines that the customer was responsible for the nondelivery or finds evidence indicating the refund request may be fraudulent.

(b) The food delivery platform shall refund the amount of the original paid gratuity to the customer but shall not take or deduct the
 original gratuity amount from the delivery driver.

(c) If it is not feasible for the food delivery platform to refund the paid gratuity to the customer in the original method of payment, the food delivery platform shall provide an alternate refund method for the paid gratuity.

(d) In the event that a customer receives an order that is only partially fulfilled, the food delivery platform shall do the following:

(1) Charge the customer only for the
 portion of the order the customer received. Any taxes, fees, or gratuities directly associated with the undelivered items shall be adjusted to reflect the reduced order.

(2) Provide a mechanism that allows the customer to adjust any gratuity that was included in the order prior to its delivery.

(e) Along with any other refund options, the food delivery platform shall provide a mechanism that allows the customer to request that the amount of the refund be returned to the original method of payment.

(f) This section does not prohibit a food delivery platform from removing a customer from the platform if the platform has a reasonable suspicion that the customer has committed or is committing
 fraud.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 341, Sec. 2.   (AB 578)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22599.3.

(a) Unless exempt pursuant to subdivision (b), a food delivery platform shall provide all of the following information to a customer on its online-enabled application or platform at the time the customer is notified their purchase is out for delivery:

(1) The driver’s first name.

(2) A picture of the driver.

(b) This section shall not apply to an order if either of the following apply:

(1) The food facility uses its own delivery driver for delivery of the order.

(2) The food facility receives the order through the food facility’s internet website or a third party that is not the food delivery platform.

(c) This section shall take effect on March 1, 2025.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 84, Sec. 1.   (AB 375)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative March 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22599.6.

The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 513, Sec. 3.   (AB 286)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 22.5. Commercial Directories [22600. - 22600.]

22600.

(a) Every publisher shall, prior to including a telephone number for a facsimile machine in any commercial directory of telephone numbers, obtain the written consent of the subscriber who has been assigned the number unless the telephone number for the facsimile machine is obtained from a telephone corporation’s alphabetical or classified directory of telephone numbers.

(b) As used in this section:

(1) “Commercial directory” does not include an alphabetical directory of telephone numbers or a classified directory published by a telephone corporation. 

(2) “Telephone number for a facsimile machine” means any number designated in a directory as being for a facsimile machine or any number included in a directory represented to be a directory of telephone numbers for facsimile machines. 

(c) Every publisher shall notify, in writing, all of the subscribers of the facsimile telephone numbers printed in the publisher’s directory of the requirements of this chapter on or before April 1, 1991. Unless the subscriber thereafter notifies the publisher otherwise, telephone numbers for facsimile machines published prior to July 1, 1991, without the written consent of the subscriber, may continue to be published by that publisher. Upon notification by the subscriber that he or she desires to be excluded from the directory, all subsequent volumes of the directory shall exclude the subscriber’s facsimile telephone number. 

(d) Every violation of subdivision (a) is an infraction punishable by a fine of five hundred dollars ($500).

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 973, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 22.6. Companion Chatbots [22601. - 22606.]

22601.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Artificial intelligence” means an engineered or machine-based system that varies in its level of autonomy and that can, for explicit or implicit objectives, infer from the input it receives how to generate outputs that can influence physical or virtual environments.

(b) (1) “Companion chatbot” means an artificial intelligence system with a natural language interface that provides adaptive, human-like responses to user inputs and is capable of meeting a user’s social needs, including by exhibiting anthropomorphic features and being able to sustain a relationship across
 multiple interactions.

(2) “Companion chatbot” does not include any of the following:

(A) A bot that is used only for customer service, a business’ operational purposes, productivity and analysis related to source information, internal research, or technical assistance.

(B) A bot that is a feature of a video game and is limited to replies related to the video game that cannot discuss topics related to mental health, self-harm, sexually explicit conduct, or maintain a
 dialogue on other topics unrelated to the video game.

(C) A stand-alone consumer electronic device that functions as a speaker and voice command interface, acts as a voice-activated virtual assistant, and does not sustain a relationship across multiple interactions or generate outputs that are likely to elicit emotional responses in the user.

(c) “Companion chatbot platform” means a platform that allows a user to engage with companion chatbots.

(d) “Office” means the Office of Suicide Prevention established pursuant to Section 131300 of the Health and Safety Code.

(e) “Operator” means a
 person who makes a companion chatbot platform available to a user in the state.

(f) “Sexually explicit conduct” has the meaning defined in Section 2256 of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(g) “Video game” means a game played on an electronic amusement device that utilizes a computer, microprocessor, or similar electronic circuitry and its own monitor, or is designed to be used with a television set or a computer monitor, that interacts with the user of the device.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 677, Sec. 1.   (SB 243)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22602.

(a) If a reasonable person interacting with a companion chatbot would be misled to believe that the person is interacting with a human, an operator shall issue a clear and conspicuous notification indicating that the companion chatbot is artificially generated and not human.

(b) (1) An operator shall prevent a companion chatbot on its companion chatbot platform from engaging with users unless the operator
 maintains a protocol for preventing the production of suicidal ideation, suicide, or self-harm content to the user, including, but not limited to, by providing a notification to the user that refers the user to crisis service providers, including a suicide hotline or crisis text line, if the user expresses suicidal ideation, suicide, or self-harm.

(2) The operator shall publish details on the protocol required by this subdivision on the operator’s internet website.

(c) An operator shall, for a user that the operator knows is a minor, do all of the following:

(1) Disclose to the user that the user is interacting with artificial intelligence.

(2) Provide by default a clear and conspicuous notification to the user at least every three hours for continuing companion chatbot interactions that reminds the user to take a break and that the companion chatbot is artificially generated and not human.

(3) Institute reasonable measures to prevent its companion chatbot from producing visual material of sexually explicit conduct or directly stating that the minor should engage in sexually explicit conduct.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 677, Sec. 1.   (SB 243)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22603.

(a) Beginning July 1, 2027, an operator shall annually report to the office all of the following:

(1) The number of times the operator has
 issued a crisis service provider referral notification pursuant to Section 22602 in the preceding calendar year.

(2) Protocols put in place to detect, remove, and respond to instances of suicidal ideation by users.

(3) Protocols put in place to prohibit a companion chatbot response about suicidal ideation or actions with the user.

(b) The report required by this section shall include only the information listed in subdivision (a) and shall not include any identifiers or personal information about users.

(c) The office shall post data from a report required by this section on its internet website.

(d) An operator shall use evidence-based methods for measuring suicidal ideation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 677, Sec. 1.   (SB 243)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22604.

An operator shall disclose to a user of its companion chatbot platform, on the application, the browser, or any other format that a user can use to access the companion chatbot platform, that companion chatbots may not be suitable for some minors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 677, Sec. 1.   (SB 243)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22605.

A person who suffers injury in fact as a result of a violation of this chapter may bring a civil action to recover all of the following relief:

(a) Injunctive relief.

(b) Damages in an amount equal to the greater of actual damages or one thousand dollars ($1,000) per violation.

(c) Reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 677, Sec. 1.   (SB 243)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22606.

The duties, remedies, and obligations imposed by this chapter are cumulative to the duties, remedies, or obligations imposed under other law and shall not be construed to relieve an operator from any duties, remedies, or obligations imposed under any other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 677, Sec. 1.   (SB 243)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 22.7. Digital Identity Theft [22670. - 22671.]

22670.

(a) (1) “Covered material” means material that meets all of the following criteria:

(A) The material is an image or video created or altered through digitization that would appear to a reasonable person to be an image or video of any of the following:

(i) An intimate body part of an identifiable person.

(ii) An identifiable person engaged in an act of sexual intercourse, sodomy, oral copulation, or sexual penetration.

(iii) An identifiable person engaged in masturbation.

(B) The reporting person is the person depicted in the material, and the reporting person did not consent to the use of the reporting person’s likeness in the material.

(C) The material is displayed, stored, or hosted on the social media platform.

(2) “Covered material” does not include an image or video that contains only minor alterations that do not lead to significant changes to the perceived content or meaning of the content, including changes to brightness or contrast of images and other minor changes that do not impact the content of the image or video.

(b) “Reporting user” means a natural person who reports material to a social media platform using the mechanism provided by the social media platform pursuant to Section 22671.

(c) “Sexually explicit digital identity theft” means the posting of covered material on a social media platform.

(d) (1) “Social media platform” has, except as provided in paragraph (2), the same meaning as defined in Section 22675.

(2) “Social media platform” does not include either of the following:

(A) A stand-alone direct messaging service that provides end-to-end encrypted communication or the portion of a multiservice platform that uses end-to-end encrypted communication.

(B) An internet-based service or application owned or operated by a nonprofit organization exempt from federal income tax pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 292, Sec. 1.   (SB 981)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

22671.

A social media platform shall do all of the following:

(a) Provide a mechanism that is reasonably accessible to a reporting user who is a California resident who has an account with the social media platform to report sexually explicit digital identity theft to the social media platform.

(b) Collect information reasonably sufficient to enable the social media platform to locate the instance of sexually explicit digital identity theft and to contact a reporting user with both of the following:

(1) Confirmation that the social media platform received the reporting user’s report within 48 hours of receipt of the report.

(2) Within seven days of the date on which the confirmation required by paragraph (1) is issued, a written update to the reporting user as to the status of the social media platform’s handling of the reported sexually explicit digital identity theft.

(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), determine within 30 days of the date on which the confirmation required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) is issued whether there is a reasonable basis to believe that the reported sexually explicit digital identity theft is sexually explicit digital identity theft.

(2) (A) If the social media platform cannot comply with paragraph (1) within 30 days due to circumstances beyond the reasonable control of the social media platform, the social media platform shall comply with paragraph
 (1) no later than 60 days after the date on which the covered material was first reported.

(B) If subparagraph (A) applies, the social media platform shall promptly provide written notice of the delay, no later than 48 hours from the time the social media platform knew the delay was likely to occur, to the reporting user using the information collected from the reporting user under subdivision (b).

(d) (1) Temporarily block a reported instance of sexually explicit digital identity theft from being publicly viewable on the social media platform pending a determination pursuant to subdivision (c).

(2) Immediately remove a reported instance of sexually explicit digital identity theft from being publicly viewable on the social media platform if the social media platform determines there is a
 reasonable basis to believe the reported sexually explicit digital identity theft is sexually explicit digital identity theft.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 292, Sec. 1.   (SB 981)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 22.8. Content Moderation Requirements for Internet Terms of Service [22675. - 22681.]

22675.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Actioned” means a social media company, due to a suspected or confirmed violation of the terms of service, has taken some form of action, including, but not limited to, removal, demonetization, deprioritization, or banning, against the relevant user or relevant item of content.

(b) “Artificial intelligence” has the same definition as in Section 11546.45.5 of the Government Code.

(c) (1) “Content” means statements or comments made by users and media that are created, posted, shared, or otherwise interacted with by users on an internet-based service or application.

(2) “Content” does not include media put on a service or application exclusively for the purpose of cloud storage, transmitting files, or file collaboration.

(d) “Public or semipublic internet-based service or application” excludes a service or application used to facilitate communication within a business or enterprise among employees or affiliates of the business or enterprise, provided that access to the service or application is restricted to employees or affiliates of the business or enterprise using the service or application.

(e) “Social media company” means a person or entity that owns or operates one or more social media platforms.

(f) “Social media platform” means a public or semipublic internet-based service or application that has users in
 California and that meets both of the following criteria:

(1) (A) A substantial function of the service or application is to connect users in order to allow users to interact socially with each other within the service or application.

(B) A service or application that provides email or direct messaging services shall not be considered to meet this criterion on the basis of that function alone.

(2) The service or application allows users to do all of the following:

(A) Construct a public or semipublic profile for purposes of signing into and using the service or application.

(B) Populate a list of other users with whom an individual shares a social connection within
 the system.

(C) Create or post content viewable by other users, including, but not limited to, on message boards, in chat rooms, or through a landing page or main feed that presents the user with content generated by other users.

(g) “Terms of service” means a policy or set of policies adopted by a social media company that specifies, at least, the user behavior and activities that are permitted on the internet-based service owned or operated by the social media company, and the user behavior and activities that may subject the user or an item of content to being actioned.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 843, Sec. 1.   (AB 2885)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

22676.

(a) A social media company shall post terms of service for each social media platform owned or operated by the company in a manner reasonably designed to inform all users of the social media platform of the existence and contents of the terms of service.

(b) The terms of service posted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include all of the following:

(1) Contact information for the purpose of allowing users to ask the social media company questions about the terms of service.

(2) A description of the process that users must follow to flag content,
 groups, or other users that they believe violate the terms of service, and the social media company’s commitments on response and resolution time.

(3) A list of potential actions the social media company may take against an item of content or a user, including, but not limited to, removal, demonetization, deprioritization, or banning.

(c) The terms of service posted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be available in all Medi-Cal threshold languages, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 128552 of the Health and Safety Code, in which the social media platform offers product features, including, but not limited to, menus and prompts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 269, Sec. 2.   (AB 587)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

22677.

(a) On a semiannual basis in accordance with subdivision (b), a social media company shall submit to the Attorney General a terms of service report. The terms of service report shall include, for each social media platform owned or operated by the company, all of the following:

(1) The current version of the terms of service of the social media platform.

(2) If a social media company has filed its first report, a complete and detailed description of any changes to the terms of service since the previous report.

(3) A statement of whether the current version of
 the terms of service defines each of the following categories of content, and, if so, the definitions of those categories, including any subcategories:

(A) Hate speech or racism.

(B) Extremism or radicalization.

(C) Disinformation or misinformation.

(D) Harassment.

(E) Foreign political interference.

(F) Controlled substance distribution.

(4) A detailed description of content moderation practices used by the social media company for that platform, including, but not limited
 to, all of the following:

(A) Any existing policies intended to address the categories of content described in paragraph (3).

(B) How automated content moderation systems enforce terms of service of the social media platform and when these systems involve human review.

(C) How the social media company responds to user reports of violations of the terms of service.

(D) How the social media company would remove individual pieces of content, users, or groups that violate the terms of service, or take broader action against individual users or against groups of users that violate the terms of service.

(E) The languages in which the social media platform does not make terms of service available, but does offer product features, including, but not limited to, menus and prompts.

(5) (A) Information on content that was flagged by the social media company as content belonging to any of the categories described in paragraph (3), including all of the following:

(i) The total number of flagged items of content.

(ii) The total number of actioned items of content.

(iii) The total number of actioned items of content that resulted in action taken by the social media company against the user or group of users responsible for the content.

(iv) The total number of actioned items of content that were removed, demonetized, or deprioritized by the social media company.

(v) The number of times actioned items of content were viewed by users.

(vi) The number of times actioned items of content were shared, and the number of users that viewed the content before it was actioned.

(vii) The number of times users appealed social media company actions taken on that platform and the number of reversals of social media company actions on appeal disaggregated by each type of action.

(B) All information required by subparagraph (A) shall be disaggregated
 into the following categories:

(i) The category of content, including any relevant categories described in paragraph (3).

(ii) The type of content, including, but not limited to, posts, comments, messages, profiles of users, or groups of users.

(iii) The type of media of the content, including, but not limited to, text, images, and videos.

(iv) How the content was flagged, including, but not limited to, flagged by company employees or contractors, flagged by artificial intelligence software, flagged by community moderators, flagged by civil society partners, and flagged by users.

(v) How the content was
 actioned, including, but not limited to, actioned by company employees or contractors, actioned by artificial intelligence software, actioned by community moderators, actioned by civil society partners, and actioned by users.

(b) (1) A social media company shall electronically submit a semiannual terms of service report pursuant to subdivision (a), covering activity within the third and fourth quarters of the preceding calendar year, to the Attorney General no later than April 1 of each year, and shall electronically submit a semiannual terms of service report pursuant to subdivision (a), covering activity within the first and second quarters of the current calendar year, to the Attorney General no later than October 1 of each year.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph
 (1), a social media company shall electronically submit its first terms of service report pursuant to subdivision (a), covering activity within the third quarter of 2023, to the Attorney General no later than January 1, 2024, and shall electronically submit its second terms of service report pursuant to subdivision (a), covering activity within the fourth quarter of 2023, to the Attorney General no later than April 1, 2024. A social media platform shall submit its third report no later than October 1, 2024, in accordance with paragraph (1).

(c) The Attorney General shall make all terms of service reports submitted pursuant to this section available to the public in a searchable repository on its official internet website.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 824, Sec. 2.   (AB 1027)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

22678.

(a) (1) A social media company that violates the provisions of this chapter shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) per violation per day, and may be enjoined in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(2) A social media company shall be considered in violation of the provisions of this chapter for each day the social media company does any of the following:

(A) Fails to post terms of service in accordance with Section 22676.

(B) Fails to timely submit to the Attorney General a report required
 pursuant to Section 22677.

(C) Materially omits or misrepresents required information in a report submitted pursuant to Section 22677.

(3) In assessing the amount of a civil penalty pursuant to paragraph (1), the court shall consider whether the social media company has made a reasonable, good faith attempt to comply with the provisions of this chapter.

(b) Actions for relief pursuant to this chapter shall be prosecuted exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction by the Attorney General
 or by a city attorney of a city having a population in excess of 750,000, or by a city attorney in a city and county in the name of the people of the State of California upon their own complaint or upon the complaint of a board, officer, person, corporation, or association.

(c) If an action pursuant to this section is brought by the Attorney General, one-half of the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered, and one-half to the General Fund.
 If the action is brought by a city attorney, one-half of the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the city in which the judgment was entered, and one-half to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 269, Sec. 2.   (AB 587)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

22679.

(a) The duties and obligations imposed by this chapter are cumulative to any other duties or obligations imposed under local, state, or federal law and shall not be construed to relieve any party from any duties or obligations imposed under law.

(b) The remedies or penalties provided by this chapter are cumulative to each other and to any other remedies or penalties available under local, state, or federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 269, Sec. 2.   (AB 587)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

22680.

This chapter shall not apply to a social media company that generated less than one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) in gross revenue during the preceding calendar year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 269, Sec. 2.   (AB 587)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

22681.

This chapter shall not be construed to apply to an internet-based service or application for which interactions between users are limited to direct messages, commercial transactions, consumer reviews of products, sellers, services, events, or places, or any combination thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 269, Sec. 2.   (AB 587)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 23. Tanning Facilities [22700. - 22708.]

22700.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Filante Tanning Facility Act of 1988.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 808, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22701.

The Legislature finds and declares:

(a) Many physicians and scientists now warn that the risks associated with suntanning are greater when tanning with artificial ultraviolet light.

(b) These risks include, but are not limited to, sunburn, premature aging, skin cancer, retinal damage, formation of cataracts, suppression of the immune system, and damage to the vascular system.

(c) Certain medications, cosmetics, and foods are “photosensitizing,” which means that in some people they react unfavorably with ultraviolet light to produce skin rashes or burns.

(d) Sunlamps and other artificial sources of ultraviolet light are known to intensify these effects.

(e) The creation of state law to protect and promote the public health, safety, and welfare is needed concerning tanning with artificial ultraviolet light.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

22702.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Tanning facility” means any location, place, area, structure, or business that provides persons access to any tanning device.

(b) “Department” means the Department of Consumer Affairs.

(c) “Phototherapy device” means equipment that emits ultraviolet radiation used by a health care professional in the treatment of disease.

(d) “Tanning device” means an ultraviolet tanning device and any accompanying equipment, including, but not limited to, protective eyewear, timers, and handrails.

(e) “Ultraviolet tanning device” means equipment that emits electromagnetic radiation with wavelengths in the air between 200 and 400 nanometers used for tanning of the skin, including, but not limited to, a sunlamp, tanning booth, or tanning bed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 590, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

22703.

This chapter does not apply to a phototherapy device used by or under the direct supervision of a licensed physician who is trained in the use of phototherapy devices.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 808, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22704.

Any tanning device used by a tanning facility shall comply with all applicable federal laws and regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 808, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22705.

(a) A tanning facility shall give each customer, prior to the customer’s use of an ultraviolet tanning device, a written statement warning that:

(1) Not wearing the eye protection provided to the customer by the tanning center may cause damage to the eyes.

(2) Overexposure causes burns.

(3) Repeated exposure may cause premature aging of the skin and
 skin cancer.

(4) Abnormal skin sensitivity or burning may be caused by certain:

(A) Foods.

(B) Cosmetics.

(C) Medications, including, but not limited to, the following:

(i) Tranquilizers.

(ii) Diuretics.

(iii) Antibiotics.

(iv) High blood pressure medicines.

(v) Birth control pills.

(5) Any person taking a prescription or over-the-counter drug should consult a physician
 before using an ultraviolet tanning device.

(6) Any person with skin that burns easily should avoid an ultraviolet tanning device.

(7) Any person with a family history or past medical history of skin cancer should avoid an ultraviolet tanning device.

(b) A tanning facility shall conspicuously post a warning sign in any area where an ultraviolet tanning device is used that is readily visible to a person using an ultraviolet tanning device. The sign shall read as follows:

DANGER: ULTRAVIOLET RADIATION

1. Follow instructions.

2. Avoid too frequent or too lengthy exposure. As with natural sunlight, exposure can
 cause eye and skin injury and allergic reactions. Repeated exposure may cause chronic sun damage characterized by wrinkling, dryness, fragility and bruising of the skin, and skin cancer.

3. Wear protective eyewear.

FAILURE TO USE PROTECTIVE EYEWEAR

MAY RESULT IN SEVERE BURNS OR

LONG-TERM INJURY TO THE EYES.

4. Ultraviolet radiation from sunlamps will aggravate the effects of the sun. Therefore, do not sunbathe before or after exposure to ultraviolet radiation.

5. Medications or
 cosmetics may increase your sensitivity to ultraviolet radiation. Consult a physician before using a sunlamp if you are using medications, have a history of skin problems, or believe you are especially sensitive to sunlight. Pregnant women or women on birth control pills who use this product may develop discolored skin.

IF YOU DO NOT TAN IN THE SUN YOU WILL

NOT TAN FROM USE OF THIS DEVICE.

(c) A tanning facility may include in the warning sign described in subdivision (b) the following statement: “Spray on tans and other sunless tanning products are not subject to the same effects as ultraviolet tanning devices.”

(d) A tanning facility shall not
 claim, or distribute promotional materials that claim, that using an ultraviolet tanning device is safe or free from risk or that indoor tanning has any known health benefits.

(e) The liability of a tanning facility operator or a manufacturer of an ultraviolet tanning device is not changed by giving the warning under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 590, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

22706.

(a) A tanning facility shall:

(1) Have an operator present during operating hours who is sufficiently knowledgeable in the correct operation of the tanning devices used at the facility so that he or she is able to inform and assist each customer in the proper use of the tanning devices.

(2) Before each use of an ultraviolet tanning device,
 provide each customer with properly sanitized protective eyewear that protects the eye from ultraviolet radiation and allows adequate vision to maintain balance; and not allow a person to use an ultraviolet tanning device if that person does not use the protective eyewear.

(3) Show each customer how to use suitable physical aids, such as handrails and markings on the floor, to maintain proper exposure distance as recommended by the manufacturer.

(4) Use a timer on an ultraviolet tanning device that has an accuracy of plus or minus 10 percent of any selected timer interval. The timer shall also be remotely located so that customers cannot set their own exposure time.

(5) Limit each customer using an ultraviolet tanning device to the maximum exposure time as recommended by the manufacturer.

(6) Control the interior temperature of a tanning facility so that it does not exceed 100 degrees Fahrenheit.

(b) (1) Every person who uses a tanning facility shall sign a written statement acknowledging that he or she has read and understood the warnings before using the device; and agrees to use the protective eyewear that the tanning facility provides. The statement of acknowledgment shall be retained by the tanning facility until the end of the calendar year at which time each person who is a current customer of the facility shall be required to renew that acknowledgment.

(2) Whenever using a tanning device a person shall use the protective eyewear that the tanning facility provides.

(3) Persons under 18 years of age are
 prohibited from using an ultraviolet tanning device.

(4) Proof of age shall be satisfied with a driver’s license or other government issued identification containing the date of birth and a photograph of the individual.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 664, Sec. 2.   (SB 746)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

22707.

If a patron is injured whereupon he or she must seek medical attention, a tanning facility shall do the following:

(a) Report any injury to the department.

(b) Send a copy of the injury report to the person who is injured.

(c) Send a copy of the injury report to the Federal Food and Drug Administration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 808, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22708.

(a) A first violation of this chapter is an infraction. Each day a first violation continues constitutes a separate infraction.

(b) Any violation of this chapter subsequent to a first violation is a misdemeanor. Each day a subsequent violation continues constitutes a separate misdemeanor.

(c) A tanning facility that has violated this chapter shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed two thousand five hundred
 dollars ($2,500) per day in addition to any other penalty established by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 758, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 24. Bakery Trays, Bakery Baskets, and Merchandise Pallets [22750. - 22754.]

22750.

For purposes of this chapter:
